Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-355
State hospitals for the mentally ill; admission of nonresidents; expenses paid quarterly in advance.

Mentally ill persons from other states and territories may be admitted to the state hospitals for the mentally ill upon equal footing and on same conditions as private-pay patients. The sum to be paid monthly for the care, maintenance, and treatment of such patients shall be fixed by the Department of Health and Human Services and shall be collected quarterly in advance by the stewards of the hospitals and accounted for the same as other funds in their hands belonging to the State of Nebraska.

G.S.1873, c. 31, § 57, p. 425;

R.S.1913, § 7279;

C.S.1922, § 6935;

C.S.1929, § 83-740;

R.S.1943, § 83-355;

Laws 1947, c. 335, § 42, p. 1073;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 946.